Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 27 Reporting of Political Contributions by State Vendors

17-27-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Aggregate amount” means the total of all contributions made to a particular general officer, candidate for general office, or political party within the time period set forth;

“Business entity” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, holding company, joint stock company, receivership, trust, or any other entity recognized in law through which business for profit is conducted;

“Contribution” means a transfer of money, paid personal services, or other thing of value reportable under the terms of chapter 25 of this title;

“Executive officer” means any person who is appointed or elected as an officer of a business entity by either the incorporators, stockholders, or directors of the business entity who is in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function of the business entity, or participates or has authority to participate other than in the capacity of a director in major policymaking functions of the business entity or who is actively engaged in soliciting business from the state or conducting, other than in a ministerial capacity, business with the state; provided, that officers of the business entity who are located outside the state, are not residents of the state, and do not participate in the business of the business entity within this state shall be exempted from the requirements of this chapter;

“Goods or services” shall not include services provided to a state agency by:

Any public utility company; or

A federal or state banking institution or other depository institution solely in connection with depository accounts held by the institution on behalf of a state agency;

“State agency” means a branch, department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, or authority of the government of the state of Rhode Island;

“State vendor” means:

A person or business entity that sells goods or provides services to any state agency,

A person or business entity which has an ownership interest of ten (10%) percent or more in a business entity that sells goods or provides services to any state agency, or

A person who is an executive officer of a business entity that sells goods or provides services to any state agency,

The spouse or minor child of a person qualifying as a state vendor under the terms of subparagraphs (A), (B) or (C) of this paragraph, unless the spouse works for a vendor in competition for state business with the reporting business entity, or

A business of the business entity that is a parent or subsidiary of a business entity that sells goods or provides services to any state agency.

“State vendor” does not mean:

A municipality,

A corporation established pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3),

A hospital,

A state or federal agency, or

A person receiving reimbursement for an approved state expense. The director of administration is authorized to provide as a public record a list of further exemptions consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 48.

17-27-2.
Affidavits required.

In connection with contracts for goods or services to be provided at a cost of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more between a state vendor and a state agency, whether written or unwritten, the state vendor shall execute, under oath, an affidavit concerning reportable contributions pursuant to chapter 25 of this title. If the state vendor has, within the twenty-four (24) months preceding the date of the contract, contributed an aggregate amount in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) within a calendar year to any general officer, any candidate for a general office, any member of the general assembly or candidate for the general assembly, or any political party; the state vendor shall file the affidavit with the board of elections and shall list the name of the general officer, member of the general assembly or candidate or political party, the amount and date of each contribution made during the preceding twenty-four (24) months and the total gross amount, in dollars, of contracts entered into between the state vendor and all state agencies during that period of time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 3.

17-27-3.
Filing of affidavits.

The affidavit required by §

17-27-2

shall be filed, together with a copy of the contract or a written summary of the principal terms of the contract, with the board of elections. If the contract is in writing, then the affidavit shall be filed within sixty (60) days of the execution of the contract; if the contract is not in writing, then the affidavit shall be filed within sixty (60) days of the date when the state vendor first is notified that they have reached the five thousand dollar ($5,000) threshold established by §

17-27-2

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any state vendor who has a reasonable belief that it would be required to make two (2) or more filings in any calendar year pursuant to this section will be deemed to have satisfied its obligations under this section if it files a notice certifying that belief with the board of elections and subsequently files an affidavit meeting the requirements of this section on or before July 31 with respect to the preceding six (6) months ending on June 30 and on or before January 31 for the six (6) month period of the preceding year ending December 31.

Parent, affiliate, or subsidiary entities of a state vendor which are required to report pursuant to this chapter may do so in the form of a consolidated report which contains the required information for both the vendor, its parent, subsidiary, or affiliated entity. All affidavits filed by state vendors pursuant to this chapter shall be public documents.

The board of elections shall maintain on its website a report of all vendors submitting affidavits as required under this chapter which report shall include: the name of the vendor, a summary description of the vendor contract, if written, or the services performed or goods purchased and their cost, and the amount of reportable contributions pursuant to chapter 25 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 3.

17-27-4.
Notification and enforcement.

The board of elections shall prepare a form affidavit for use by state vendors in compliance with the requirements of §

17-27-2

.

Each state agency which solicits or contracts with state vendors shall establish procedures for informing state vendors and potential state vendors of the requirements of this chapter.

The board of elections shall be responsible for the enforcement of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 249, § 1.

17-27-5.
Civil penalties.

Any state vendor found by the board of elections to have willfully and knowingly violated the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per offense.

Any state vendor found by the board of elections to have willfully and knowingly violated the provisions of this chapter: (1) in connection with the commission of or in an attempt to commit fraud or bribery, (2) to conceal any political contribution unlawful under the provisions of chapter 25 of this title or any conduct prohibited by §

36-14.1-2

, or (3) in an effort to induce any public official to violate any provision of chapter 14 of title 36, may be declared ineligible for the award of any additional state contracts for a period of time that the board of elections reasonably deems proportionate to the severity of the subject violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 249, § 1.